Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-832
Unconstitutional.

The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-705 omitted sections 66-825 to 66-841 because the Supreme Court in State ex rel. Douglas v. Thone, 204 Neb. 836, 286 N.W.2d 249 (1979), held such sections from LB 571, Laws 1979, to be unconstitutional.